New York, session 2025-2026, S4697.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The parks, recreation and historic preservation law is 2 amended by adding a new section 13.32 to read as follows: 3 § 13.32 Checkout NY pass. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of 4 law to the contrary, the office and all other state agencies having 5 jurisdiction of a state park or recreational facility shall establish a 6 Checkout NY pass which shall run from April first of each year to March 7 thirty-first of the following year, entitling the holder thereof to 8 admission without additional fee to any state park, historical site or 9 recreational facility operated by the office or the department of envi- 10 ronmental conservation or provides for discounts offered in comparison 11 to other admission programs offered by the office. The annual fee for 12 such pass shall be consistent with the fee schedule for each particular 13 year established pursuant to section 13.15 of this article and shall be 14 approved by the director of the budget. 15 2. The office shall provide one such pass to each library which is 16 part of a consolidated, federated and cooperative public library system 17 within the state free of charge for circulation through a distribution 18 process managed by the New York state library system. The office shall 19 provide for a consolidated, federated, and cooperative library system, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09164-01-5 S. 4697 2 1 or the New York state library system to purchase additional passes for 2 circulation. 3 3. The office or other state agency having jurisdiction over a state 4 park, historical site or recreational facility shall promulgate such 5 rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of 6 this section. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.